Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1703
Misdemeanors; recognizance for appearance; authority of sheriff to take.

When any sheriff or other officer shall be charged with the execution of a warrant issued on any indictment for a misdemeanor, he shall, during the vacation of the court from which the writ issued, have authority to take the recognizance of the person so indicted, together with sufficient sureties, resident and freeholders in the county from which such writ issued, in a sum of not less than fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, conditioned for the appearance of such person on the first day of the next term of such court.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 428, p. 820;

R.S.1913, § 9072;

C.S.1922, § 10096;

C.S.1929, § 29-1703;

R.S.1943, § 29-1703.

This section governs duties of sheriff in case of taking bond. Berrer v. Moorhead, 22 Neb. 687, 36 N.W. 118 (1888).